static/hunspell/05.11.2023/udm.dic
брюшной/A1N1R1
григорианской/A1N1R1
кругосветной/A1N1R1
обществоведческой/A1N1R1
профессорской/A1N1R1
транснациональной/A1N1R1
вочакмы/M1U3
вочакты/M1U3
вочаксы/M1D1U3
вочнамы/M1D1U3
вочнады/M1D1U3
вочназы/M1U3
вочакнамы/M1U3
вочакез/M1U3
вочакыз/M1U3
ома/M1U3
омар/M1U3
тускаб/N1U2
азьпыд/N1U2
асэрказ/N1U2
маскари/N1U2
вузтодосчи/N1U2
ӟечлыкопужей/N1U2
ӝожлык/N1U2
гажанлык/N1U2
вуюонлык/N1U2
сӥбурлык/N1U2
лэйкытлык/N1U2
почваул/N1U2
куспаськем/N1U2
кылтупатэм/N1U2
кöчыртэм/N1U2
эсэпъям/N1U2
йыркобытодон/N1U2
вачевуон/N1U2
вузъюртъер/N1U2
улонсюрес/N1U2
мурткылпус/N1U2
катбичет/N1U2
азьлэт/N1U2
вылку/N1U2
берпась/N1U2
ӟортэт/N1U3
автоответчик/N1R1
баретка/N1R1
величина/N1R1
гигакалорий/N1R1
десятской/N1R1
заклёпка/N1R1
капелла/N1R1
конвой/N1R1
лесокомбинат/N1R1
методкабинет/N1R1
начёт/N1R1
отличница/N1R1
писательница/N1R1
потребитель/N1R1
рабочий/N1R1
самогонка/N1R1
сноуборд/N1R1
сутки/N1R1
турник/N1R1
харей/N1R1
штурмфюрер/N1R1
акын/N1R2
антаблемент/N1R2
арьерсцена/N1R2
бантенг/N1R2
болеро/N1R2
вахтер/N1R2
гарпиус/N1R2
гидропоника/N1R2
грануляция/N3R2
дескриптор/N1R2
дихотомия/N3R2
изоляция/N3R2
иппокрена/N1R2
карцинома/N1R2
корд/N1R2
лорнет/N1R2
мирт/N1R2
ольдермен/N1R2
першерон/N1R2
протеиноид/N1R2
ротаметр/N1R2
социолект/N1R2
тетания/N3R2
фециал/N1R2
цезура/N1R2
эликсир/N1R2
абиссинец/N1R3
аджарец/N1R3
азинец/N1R3
американец/N1R3
арий/N1R3
африканец/N1R3
бербер/N1R3
венгр/N1R3
гегельянец/N1R3
даргин/N1R3
индо-европеец/N1R3
кабардин/N1R3
кафр/N1R3
курд/N1R3
луораветлан/N1R3
мордва/N1R3
ненец/N1R3
орочон/N1R3
папуас/N1R3
прансуз/N1R3
сириец/N1R3
тангут/N1R3
тюрк/N1R3
финн-угор/N1R3
черкес/N1R3
эвенк/N1R3
японец/N1R3
Dart/Q2
CD/Q2
COM/Q2
DNS/Q2
DVD/Q2
E-maіl/Q2
Excel/Q2
Flash/Q2
GoldenDіct/Q2
Goore/Q2
HTML/Q2
http/Q2
IFUSCO/Q2
iPhone/Q2
IP/Q2
LAN/Q2
LPT/Q2
Mіcrosoft/Q2
POR0/Q2
PS/Q2
Silent/Q2
SQL/Q2
UdmurtPackage/Q2
VIP/Q2
Woo/Q2
www/Q2
ZІP/Q2
іРаd/Q2
Б/Q3
В/Q3
Г/Q3
Д/Q3
Е/Q3
Ё/Q3
Ж/Q3
З/Q3
И/Q3
Й/Q3
К/Q3
Л/Q3
М/Q3
Н/Q3
О/Q3
П/Q3
Р/Q3
С/Q3
У/Q3
Х/Q3
Ч/Q3
Щ/Q3
Ю/Q3
кв./Q3
стр./Q3
мин./Q3
обл./Q3
км/Q4
м/Q4
см/Q4
га/Q4
кВт/Q4
млн/Q4
мм/Q4
кг/Q4
млрд/Q4
Пыхта/T1N1
Батырбам/T1N1
Трыч/T1N1
Выселка/T1N1
Даньлопочинка/T1N1
Медьма/T1N1
Пужмезьульча/T1N1
Ӟучлуд/T1N1
Осеньчуги/T1N1
Дурнопи/T1N1
Улӥ/T1N1
Биржай/T1N1
Аксак/T1N1
Сандырнюк/T1N1
Пужмойыл/T1N1
Ӟӧтым/T1N1
Тӥгырмен/T1N1
Выӝо/T1N1
Пивовар/T1N1
Чупчидур/T1N1
Шишур/T1N1
Усошур/T1N1
Дебэс/T1N1
Турынгурт/T1N1
Йыраш/T1N1
Бырдась/T1N1
Архангельской/T2N1
Байситово/T2N1
Берёзка/T2N1
Бурмакино/T2N1
Волковский/T2N1
Галкино/T2N1
Дзякино/T2N1
Ежево/T2N1
Заречной/T2N1
Иваново-Самарск/T2N1
Камки/T2N1
Кечёво/T2N1
Ключёвка/T2N1
Красной/T2N1
Кукуи/T2N1
Левятской/T2N1
Марково/T2N1
Нижневоткинской/T2N1
Орешата/T2N1
Пестерево/T2N1
Поляково/T2N1
Рысаи/T2N1
Степаново/T2N1
Тюрики/T2N1
Шафеево/T2N1
Замятьево/T2N1
Азов/T3N1
Аррабона/T3N1
Башмаково/T3N1
Ботерст/T3N1
Весёлый/T3N1
Гвадалквивир/T3N1
Дарасунка/T3N1
Дутигала/T3N1
Ибер/T3N1
Калькутта/T3N1
Кеш/T3N1
Коровино/T3N1
Куровское/T3N1
Лосино-Петровский/T3N1
Матросово/T3N1
Мурат/T3N1
Новоаннинский/T3N1
Опорто/T3N1
Петрозаводск/T3N1
Приозерск/T3N1
Рудки/T3N1
Семёново/T3N1
Тарбагатай/T3N1
Уэд-Шелнфф/T3N1
Чойбалсан/T3N1
Зауралье/T3N1
Пермь/T4N1
Москва/T4N1
Казань/T4N1
влахернской/T5N1
третьяковской/T5N1
Южно-Африканской/T5N1
Раменской/T5N1
Муско/T5N1
Перма/T5N1
Свияж/T5N1
Курил/T5N1
Анда/T5N1
Гималай/T5N1
Кордильер/T5N1
Судет/T5N1
Высокой/T5N1
Игольной/T5N1
Студёной/T5N1
Огненной/T5N1
Кривой/T5N1
Большой/T5N1
Быстрой/T5N1
Сюгинской/T5N1
Пушкинской/T5N1
Волочаевской/T5N1
Озёрной/T5N1
Низменной/T5N1
Кировской/T5N1
Нижной/T5N1
Даняпал/T6N1# сурам
Динамовской/T6N1# сульча
Коммунаров/T6#
Луначарской/T6#
Великие/T6#
Дубровской/T6# урам
Большая/T6
Татарские/T6# Парзи
Малый/T6# Казес
Магнитная/T6
Земля/T6N
Магелланов/T6
Дерегин/T6
Баффинов/T6
Девисов/T6
Торресов/T6
Невольничье/T6
Вышний/T6
Нижней/T6
Нижняя/T6
Охотной/T6
Соломонов/T6# шормуӵъёс
Кариб/T6# зарезь
Автзаводской/T6# ульча
Старой/T6# Русса
Сенной/T6# базар
петрозаводской/T7N1
черновской/T7N1
азорской/T7N1
амурской/T7N1
арагонской/T7N1
байдарской/T7N1
белорусской/T7N1
боденской/T7N1
винницкой/T7N1
гамбургской/T7N1
дарьяльской/T7N1
заалайской/T7N1
иркутской/T7N1
карельской/T7N1
красноводской/T7N1
Литовско-Белорусской/T7N1
минусинской/T7N1
ниагарской/T7N1
орловской/T7N1
приволжской/T7N1
сарыкамышской/T7N1
софийской/T7N1
тарнопольской/T7N1
урало-каспийской/T7N1
черновицкой/T7N1
эмбинской/T7N1
бурсӥзьыны/V1U2
